South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H5251.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  This act may be cited as the "Charity Protection Act." SECTION 2.  Chapter 56, Title 33 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 33-56-65.  (A) Except where specifically required or authorized by federal law, no state agency or state official shall impose any annual filing or reporting requirements that are more burdensome than the requirements established in this chapter. (B) This section shall not apply to state grants and contracts or fraud investigations, nor shall it restrict enforcement actions against a charitable organization. (C) The provisions of this section shall supersede any statute or regulation that conflicts with this section. SECTION 3.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----